Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5848.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 112. (1) A person that operates a battery energy storage system shall ensure that the critical infrastructure has security measures in place to protect against all of the following: (a) Cyberattacks. (b) Physical attacks or cyber disruptions to critical functions such as cooling, fire suppression, and battery management systems. (c) Cyber compromise. (2) A person that operates a battery energy storage system shall implement a risk-based cybersecurity and resilience program to achieve the security measures described in subsection (1). The risk-based cybersecurity and resilience program must be aligned with nationally recognized cybersecurity frameworks and guidance, including the NIST cybersecurity framework and guidance issued by the cybersecurity and infrastructure security agency, without requiring compliance with any single framework or technology. (3) A person that operates a battery energy storage system shall use all of the following systems, as applicable: (a) Thermal runaway mitigation. (b) Automatic abnormal temperature shutdown. (c) Safety-critical systems that are capable of defaulting to a safe state. (d) Redundant cooling and thermal controls. (e) Fire suppression that is capable of operating independent of remote commands. (f) On-site manual override access. (g) Segmentation of safety-critical systems from public-facing networks. (4) A person that operates a battery energy storage system shall create and maintain an incident response plan and a disaster recovery plan that include, but are not limited to, the following information: (a) Employment roles and responsibilities. (b) Communication and notification procedures. (c) System restoration priorities. (d) Procedures for coordinating with emergency responders. (5) A person that violates this section is subject to a civil fine of not more than $25,000.00 per day per violation. Each day that the violation continues constitutes a separate violation. The prosecutor of the county in which the violation occurred or the attorney general may bring an action to collect the fine. (6) As used in this section: (a) "Battery energy storage facility" means a facility that has an aggregate storage capacity greater than 1 megawatt. (b) "Critical infrastructure" means safety critical systems necessary for safe operation. (c) "Safety-critical systems" means operational technology and related systems that are necessary for the safe operation of a battery energy storage facility and to prevent conditions that could pose a risk to the public health or safety or system reliability. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law.